Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 1. Inducement to Construction of a Natural Gas Pipeline in This State.

Article 1. Inducement to Construction of a Natural Gas Pipeline in This State.

Sec. 43.90.010.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to encourage expedited construction of a natural gas pipeline that

facilitates commercialization of North Slope gas resources in the state;

promotes exploration and development of oil and gas resources on the North Slope in the state;

maximizes benefits to the people of the state from the development of oil and gas resources in the state; and

encourages oil and gas lessees and other persons to commit to ship natural gas from the North Slope to a gas pipeline system for transportation to markets in this state or elsewhere.

History.

(§ 1 ch 22 SLA 2007)